Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 32. Department of Administration and Information
§ 9-2-3208.
Duties performed through division of economic analysis.

The department through the division of economic analysis, in cooperation with other governmental and private agencies, shall:

Assist state agencies in developing statistical and informational management programs by collecting, compiling, analyzing and distributing information and statistics when the information is readily available from other agencies, and eliminate the duplication of collection, compilation and distribution of information or data prepared by agencies;

Act as overall supervisory and coordinating authority for statistical, informational or research programs conducted by or on behalf of agencies;

Conduct statistical research and studies on its own authority or as requested by other governmental bodies;

Establish uniform criteria for collecting, distributing, compiling, reporting and analyzing statistical and other information generated by agencies;

Establish and maintain a central depository of statistical and other data relative to the operation of state government for the economic and environmental life of this state;

Consolidate into digest form information and reports which lend themselves to compilation;

Establish uniform criteria for collecting, compiling, analyzing, reporting and distributing economic data for all Wyoming counties related to uses of and economic impacts to state and federal surface and mineral lands, including but not limited to development of agriculture, grazing, minerals, timber, water, industrial resources, recreation and energy production;

Utilize a nationally recognized model for the compilation and the analysis of the data described in paragraph (vii) of this subsection;

Collect, compile, analyze, maintain, update, report, distribute and consolidate into digest form the economic data described in paragraph (vii) of this subsection. The analysis shall be independent pertaining to the data collected and shall not express any opinion of the economic impacts determined under paragraph (vii) of this subsection. Any economic data collected, compiled, analyzed, maintained, updated, reported or consolidated by the division of economic analysis under this subsection, other than information that is not available for inspection under W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

, shall be available for public review and comment. This data shall be updated at least once every three (3) years;

Supervise and coordinate statistical, informational or research programs conducted by the division on behalf of counties and establish and maintain a central depository of economic, statistical and other data relative to Wyoming counties;

Prepare an annual catalog listing the type of statistical information available from state agencies and other sources.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 203, § 29; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.18:76; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-2028; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 2011, ch. 154, § 1; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-1024

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2011 amendment,

in (a), added present (a)(vii) through (a)(x), and redesignated former (a)(vii) as present (a)(xi).

Laws 2011, ch. 154, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2011, ch. 154, §§ 2–4 provide: “Sec. 2: There is authorized one (1) full-time position to the department of administration and information, economic analysis division for the purpose of implementing this act. There is appropriated two hundred fifty-five thousand dollars ($255,000.00) from the general fund to the department of administration and information. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purpose of implementing this act and shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2012. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2012.

“Sec. 3: From the effective date of this act through June 30, 2012,the department of administration and information, economic analysisdivision, may contract for one (1) at-will contract employee for purposesof administering this act. There is appropriated from the generalfund thirty-four thousand dollars ($34,000.00) for purposes of thissection. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriationshall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and anyunexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shallrevert as provided by law on June 30, 2012. This appropriation shallnot be included in the department's 2013-2014 standard biennial budgetrequest.

“Sec. 4: No later than January 1, 2013, the department of administrationand information shall report to the joint agriculture, public landsand water resources interim committee and joint appropriations interimcommittee regarding all amounts expended to implement this act aswell as the department's progress in implementing this act.”

Legislative delegation of population estimation to state agency

as the formula determinate for issuance of liquor licenses does not constitute an unconstitutional delegation of legislative power to the executive branch of government. State ex rel. Stocker v. Laramie, 737 P.2d 746,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 451

(Wyo. 1987).

§ 9-2-3209.
Purchasing for legislature and judiciary; approval; requirements.

Purchases of supplies and services for the legislature shall be approved by the management council or its designee. Purchases of supplies and services for the judiciary shall be approved by the judges for their respective courts. Purchases of supplies and services by the offices of state elected officials shall be approved by the respective elected official or his designee and made in accordance with the requirements and guidelines of W.S.

9-2-3204

. Purchases by the legislature or the judiciary shall be made in accordance with the requirements and guidelines for competitive or negotiated purchases or contracts set forth in W.S.

9-2-3204

(b)(iv)(A) and (B).

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 10, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-2032; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1994, ch. 57, § 1; 2005, ch. 181, § 1; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-1026

by 2021 ch. 56, §§ 4, 6, effective April 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to management council, see §

28-8-102

.

The 2005 amendment

inserted the third sentence.

Laws 2005, ch. 181, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

§ 9-2-3210
Federal library funds.

The director may accept and receive all funds, monies or library materials made available by the federal government for the improvement and development of public library services in the state.

The state treasurer is custodian of all federal funds allocated to the state for statewide library services. The director shall disburse the funds subject to all provisions of law and submit receipt and acknowledgement to the state treasurer.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 29, § 2; 2005, ch. 142, § 1; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-1026

.5 by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted provisions giving the state library board authority to carry out the specified duties.

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, rewrote (b), which formerly read: “The state treasurer is custodian of all federal funds allocated to the state for statewide library services and shall disburse the funds on the requisition of the director and subject to other provisions of law.”

§ 9-2-3211.
State librarian; appointment; qualifications; filing of state publications; deposit of designated documents; exchange of session laws.

A state librarian shall be appointed by the director of the department of administration and information and shall serve as the administrator of the state library division of the department. The state librarian shall have:

Completed the required courses in a recognized or accredited library school or shall have educational and library administrative experience required by the human resources division of the department;

Charge and custody of all materials belonging to the state library.

With the approval of the director, the state librarian may employ within the state library division necessary deputies, assistants and employees and shall:

Develop a budget for the state library and control the expenditures of funds appropriated for and received by the library;

Accept gifts or grants of any nature for the purpose of carrying on the work of the state library division;

Report to the director regarding the receipts, disbursements, work and needs of the state library division;

Expend or disburse gifts and grants as approved in writing by the director;

Adopt policies and projects to fulfill the purposes of this act regarding the state library division.

For purposes of maintaining a state publications depository system, up to seven (7) copies of each publication issued by a state officer, commission, commissioner or board of a state institution shall be deposited with the state library for distribution as follows:

Three (3) copies to the state library permanent file;

Two (2) copies to the university library;

One (1) copy to the library of congress;

One (1) copy to the council of state governments; and

The total number of copies and distributions may be modified at the discretion of the state librarian.

All officers and persons who receive any books, maps, charts or other documents designed for the use of the state library or the department, shall deposit the same immediately on receipt thereof with either the state librarian or the director.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 210, § 3.

The state librarian shall guide local library agencies participating in any state plan for the expenditure of any federal funds or materials. The state librarian shall assure compliance with the policies and methods of administration under the state plan.

The state librarian is responsible for the extension and development of library services throughout the state and shall supervise and superintend the expenditures of monies provided for library services and federal funds allocated to the state for these purposes.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 84, §§ 2, 3; C.S. 1945, §§ 18-107, 18-108; Laws 1953, ch. 143, §§ 3 to 5, 15; 1955, ch. 193, § 4; 1957, ch. 146, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-7, 9-8, 9-198 to 9-200, 9-202; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-1-109, 9-1-110, 9-3-901, 9-3-902, 9-3-920, 9-3-922; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

9-2-417

; Laws 1990, ch. 33, § 2; 1991, ch. 29, § 4; ch. 56, § 1; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2005, ch. 142, § 1; ch. 210, § 3; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-1026

.6 by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to establishment and location of the state university, see art. 7, §§ 15, 23, Wyo. Const., and §

21-17-101

.

For duty of state librarian to distribution of copies of reports of supreme court, see §

5-2-402

.

As to duty of judges of supreme court to direct expenditures of law library, see §

5-2-501

.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 142, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, deleted provisions pertaining to the state library board in (a) and (f).

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 210, § 3, effective July 1, 2005, repealed former, (e) directing the state librarian to send to the library of any requesting state or territory one copy of the Wyoming session laws in exchange for the laws of the requesting state or territory. For present similar provisions see §

5-2-502

.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (b)(v), see § 9-2-1002(a)(x).

Stated

in

County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960 (Wyo. 1988).

§ 9-2-3212.
State librarian; acquisition of books and materials; disposition of outdated and unused books; disposition of unused materials and supplies; promulgation of rules.

With the approval of the director, the state librarian may:

Acquire books, materials, equipment and supplies which are necessary for the efficient operation of the state library;

Sell outdated and unused books in the collection of the state library when the director deems the sale necessary due to limited shelf space;

Regulate the hours during which the library is open for the use of educators, students and researchers. To accommodate these uses, he may stagger the working schedules of the library employees in accordance with rules and regulations of the human resources division of the department.

Prior to sale under subsection (a) of this section the department of state parks and cultural resources shall be given an opportunity to choose, without charge, books which have special historical value. After the department of state parks and cultural resources has had an opportunity to choose books it desires, any library in this state which is supported by public funds shall be given an opportunity to take, without charge, books it desires to add to its collection.

At the recommendation of the state librarian the department may dispose of unused materials, supplies or equipment belonging to the state library in any manner provided by law.

The department may promulgate necessary rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this section.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 143, § 8; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-199.1 to 9-199.3, 9-203; Laws 1971, ch. 170, §§ 1 to 3; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-3-903 to 9-3-905, 9-3-923; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-2-418; Laws 1991, ch. 29, § 4; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 1; 2005, ch. 142, § 1; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-1026

.7 by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “director” for “board” in (a)(ii); and deleted “in consultation with the board” in (d).

§ 9-2-3213.
Interstate Library Compact; enactment; form.

The Interstate Library Compact is hereby enacted into law and entered into by this state with all states legally joining therein in the form substantially as follows:

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 70, § 1; ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-212.9; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1001; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

9-2-420

; Laws 1991, ch. 29, § 5; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-1026

.8 by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

INTERSTATE LIBRARY COMPACT

Article I

Because the desire for the services provided by libraries transcends governmental boundaries and can most effectively be satisfied by giving such services to communities and people regardless of jurisdictional lines, it is the policy of the states party to this compact to cooperate and share their responsibilities; to authorize cooperation and sharing with respect to those types of library facilities and services which can be more economically or efficiently developed and maintained on a cooperative basis, and to authorize cooperation and sharing among localities, states and others in providing joint or cooperative library services in areas where the distribution of population or of existing and potential library resources make the provision of library service on an interstate basis the most effective way of providing adequate and efficient service.

Article II

As used in this compact:

“Public library agency” means any unit or agency of local or state government operating or having power to operate a library;

“Private library agency” means any nongovernmental entity which operates or assumes a legal obligation to operate a library;

“Library agreement” means a contract establishing an interstate library district pursuant to this compact or providing for the joint or cooperative furnishing of library services.

Article III

Any one (1) or more public library agencies in a party state in cooperation with any public library agency or agencies in one (1) or more other party states may establish and maintain an interstate library district. Subject to the provisions of this compact and any other laws of the party states which pursuant hereto remain applicable, such district may establish, maintain and operate some or all of the library facilities and services for the area concerned in accordance with the terms of a library agreement therefor. Any private library agency or agencies within an interstate library district may cooperate therewith, assume duties, responsibilities and obligations thereto, and receive benefits therefrom as provided in any library agreement to which such agency or agencies become party.

Within an interstate library district, and as provided by a library agreement, the performance of library functions may be undertaken on a joint or cooperative basis or may be undertaken by means of one (1) or more arrangements between or among public or private library agencies for the extension of library privileges to the use of facilities or services operated or rendered by one (1) or more of the individual library agencies.

If a library agreement provides for joint establishment, maintenance or operation of library facilities or services by an interstate library district, such district shall have power to do any one (1) or more of the following in accordance with such library agreement:

Undertake, administer and participate in programs or arrangements for securing, lending or servicing books and other publications, any other materials suitable to be kept or made available by libraries, library equipment or for the dissemination of information about libraries, the value and significance of particular items therein, and the use thereof;

Accept for any of its purposes under this compact any and all donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, (conditional or otherwise), from any state or the United States or any subdivision or agency thereof, or interstate agency, or from any institution, person, firm or corporation, and receive, utilize and dispose of the same;

Operate mobile library units or equipment for the purpose of rendering bookmobile service within the district;

Employ professional, technical, clerical and other personnel, and fix terms of employment, compensation and other appropriate benefits; and where desirable, provide for the in-service training of such personnel;

Sue and be sued in any court of competent jurisdiction;

Acquire, hold, and dispose of any real or personal property or any interest or interests therein as may be appropriate to the rendering of library service;

Construct, maintain and operate a library, including any appropriate branches thereof;

Do such other things as may be incidental to or appropriate for the carrying out of any of the foregoing powers.

Article IV

An interstate library district which establishes, maintains or operates any facilities or services in its own right shall have a governing board which shall direct the affairs of the district and act for it in all matters relating to its business. Each participating public library agency in the district shall be represented on the governing board which shall be organized and conduct its business in accordance with provision therefor in the library agreement. But in no event shall a governing board meet less often than twice a year.

Any private library agency or agencies party to a library agreement establishing an interstate library district may be represented on or advise with the governing board of the district in such manner as the library agreement may provide.

Article V

Any two (2) or more state library agencies of two (2) or more of the party states may undertake and conduct joint or cooperative library programs, render joint or cooperative library services, and enter into and perform arrangements for the cooperative or joint acquisition, use, housing and disposition of items or collections of materials which, by reason of expense, rarity, specialized nature, or infrequency of demand therefor would be appropriate for central collection and shared use. Any such programs, services or arrangements may include provision for the exercise on a cooperative or joint basis of any power exercisable by an interstate library district and an agreement embodying any such program, service or arrangement shall contain provisions covering the subjects detailed in Article VI of this compact for interstate library agreements.

Article VI

In order to provide for any joint or cooperative undertaking pursuant to this compact, public and private library agencies may enter into library agreements. Any agreement executed pursuant to the provisions of this compact shall, as among the parties to the agreement:

Detail the specific nature of the services, programs, facilities, arrangements or properties to which it is applicable;

Provide for the allocation of costs and other financial responsibilities;

Specify the respective rights, duties, obligations and liabilities of the parties;

Set forth the terms and conditions for duration, renewal, termination, abrogation, disposal of joint or common property, if any, and all other matters which may be appropriate to the proper effectuation and performance of the agreement.

No public or private library agency shall undertake to exercise itself, or jointly with any other library agency, by means of a library agreement any power prohibited to such agency by the constitution or statutes of its state.

No library agreement shall become effective until filed with the compact administrator of each state involved, and approved in accordance with Article VII of this compact.

Article VII

Every library agreement made pursuant to this compact shall, prior to and as a condition precedent to its entry into force, be submitted to the attorney general of each state in which a public library agency party thereto is situated, who shall determine whether the agreement is in proper form and compatible with the laws of his state. The attorneys general shall approve any agreement submitted to them unless they shall find that it does not meet the conditions set forth herein and shall detail in writing addressed to the governing bodies of the public library agencies concerned the specific respects in which the proposed agreement fails to meet the requirements of law. Failure to disapprove an agreement submitted hereunder within ninety (90) days of its submission shall constitute approval thereof.

In the event that a library agreement made pursuant to this compact shall deal in whole or in part with the provision of services or facilities with regard to which an officer or agency of the state government has constitutional or statutory powers of control, the agreement shall, as a condition precedent to its entry into force, be submitted to the state officer or agency having such power of control and shall be approved or disapproved by him or it as to all matters within his or its jurisdiction in the same manner and subject to the same requirements governing the action of the attorneys general pursuant to paragraph (a) of this article. This requirement of submission and approval shall be in addition to and not in substitution for the requirement of submission to and approval by the attorneys general.

Article VIII

Nothing in this compact or in any library agreement shall be construed to supersede, alter or otherwise impair any obligation imposed on any library by otherwise applicable law, nor to authorize the transfer or disposition of any property held in trust by a library agency in a manner contrary to the terms of such trust.

Article IX

Any public library agency party to a library agreement may appropriate funds to the interstate library district established thereby in the same manner and to the same extent as to a library wholly maintained by it and, subject to the laws of the state in which such public library agency is situated, may pledge its credit in support of an interstate library district established by the agreement.

Subject to the provisions of the library agreement pursuant to which it functions and the laws of the states in which such district is situated, an interstate library district may claim and receive any state and federal aid which may be available to library agencies.

Article X

Each state shall designate a compact administrator with whom copies of all library agreements to which his state or any public library agency thereof is party shall be filed. The administrator shall have such other powers as may be conferred upon him by the laws of his state and may consult and cooperate with the compact administrators of other party states and take such steps as may effectuate the purposes of this compact. If the laws of a party state so provide, such state may designate one (1) or more deputy compact administrators in addition to its compact administrator.

Article XI

This compact shall enter into force and effect immediately upon its enactment into law by any two (2) states. Thereafter, it shall enter into force and effect as to any other state upon the enactment thereof by such state.

This compact shall continue in force with respect to a party state and remain binding upon such state until six (6) months after such state has given notice to each other party state of the repeal thereof. Such withdrawal shall not be construed to relieve any party to a library agreement entered into pursuant to this compact from any obligation of that agreement prior to the end of its duration as provided therein.

Article XII

This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state party thereto, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.

§ 9-2-3214.
Compliance with local laws prerequisite to entering into library agreement.

No city, town, county, school district or public district of any sort of this state shall be party to a library agreement which provides for the construction or maintenance of a library pursuant to article III, paragraph (c)(vii) of the Interstate Library Compact, nor pledge its credit in support of such a library, or contribute to the capital financing thereof, except after compliance with any laws applicable to such cities, towns, counties, school districts or public districts of any sort relating to or governing capital outlays and the pledging of credit.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 70, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-212.10; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1002; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-2-421; Laws 1991, ch. 29, § 5; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-1026

.9 by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “paragraph (c)(vii)” for “(c-7).”

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 9-2-3215.
“State library agency”.

As used in the Interstate Library Compact [§

9-2-1026

.8], “state library agency”, with reference to this state, means the state library division of the department.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 70, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 9-212.11; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1003; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-2-422; Laws 1991, ch. 29, § 4; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-1026

.10 by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-3216.
State and federal aid to interstate library districts.

An interstate library district lying partly within this state may claim and be entitled to receive state aid in support of any of its functions to the same extent and in the same manner as such functions are eligible for support when carried on by entities wholly within this state. For the purpose of computing and apportioning state aid to an interstate library district, this state will consider that portion of the area which lies within this state as an independent entity for the performance of the aided function or functions and compute and apportion the aid accordingly. Subject to any applicable laws of this state, such a district also may apply for and be entitled to receive federal aid for which it may be eligible.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 70, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 9-212.12; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1004; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-2-423; Laws 1991, ch. 29, § 5; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-1026

.11 by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-3217.
Appointment of compact administrator and deputy administrators; removal.

The governor shall appoint an officer of this state who shall be the compact administrator pursuant to article X of the compact. The governor may also appoint one (1) or more deputy Interstate Library Compact administrators pursuant to article X. The governor may remove any appointee under this section as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 70, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 9-212.13; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1005; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-2-424; Laws 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1991, ch. 29, § 5; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-1026

.12 by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-3218.
Notice of withdrawal from compact.

In the event of withdrawal from the Interstate Library Compact [§

9-2-1026

.8] the governor shall send and receive any notices required by article XI(b) of the compact.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 70, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 9-212.14; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1006; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-2-425; Laws 1991, ch. 29, § 5; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-1026

.13 by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-3219.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Committee” means the joint appropriations committee;

“Department” means the department of administration and information;

“Internet” means the internet, World Wide Web or a similar proprietary or common carrier electronic system;

“Participating state entity” or “state entity” means the state of Wyoming government including the executive, legislative and judicial branches of government, the University of Wyoming and any department, division, agency, board, commission or other instrumentality of those branches;

“Public financial information” means official public records as defined in W.S. 16-4-201(a)(vi)(A) that are required to be made available on the Wyoming public finance and expenditure of funds website as required by this act, but shall not include any information:

Provided pursuant to W.S.

26-34-129

,

26-34-130

,

28-8-108

,

35-2-910

or

35-17-105

;

Relating to benefits paid under the Worker’s Compensation Act that would reveal the identity of the recipient;

Relating to services provided to juveniles under title 14 or title 21 of the Wyoming statutes that would reveal the identity of the juvenile or his family;

That would violate the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act or the Health Care Quality Improvement Act.

“Local government entity” means any county, municipality, joint powers board,airport board, community college district, school district, special district and any other political subdivision of Wyoming;

“This act” means W.S.

9-2-3219

through

9-2-3221

.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 190, § 1; 2012, ch. 94, § 1; 2018 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 78, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 37, § 1, effective March 10, 2020; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-1035

by 2021 ch. 56, §§ 4, 6, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2012 amendment,

in (a)(iv), added “or ‘state entity’,” and added the present last sentence; added (a)(vi), and redesignated former (a)(vi) as (a)(vii).

Laws 2012, ch. 94, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in the introductory language of (a)(v), inserted “and expenditure of funds” preceding “website.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(v)(A), deleted “35-2-605 through

35-2-617

.”

The 2020 amendment,

in (a)(iv) added “the University of Wyoming” following “branches of government” and deleted the last sentence, which read “For purposes of W.S. 9-2-1036(b)(viii), ‘state entity’ shall also include the University of Wyoming.”

Laws 2020, ch. 37, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2020.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2009, ch. 190, § 1, provides: “There is appropriated twelve thousand three hundred dollars ($12,300.00) from the general fund to the department of administration and information. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2010. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of W.S.

9-2-1035

through

9-2-1037

as created in this act.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 190, § 1, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.